Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 8 Legislative Council

22-8-1.
Creation — Functions.

There is created a legislative council of seven (7) members for the purpose of obtaining information on the operation of the state government and of making a study of legislative problems. It shall be the function of the legislative council:

To collect factual information and to advise the general assembly on matters submitted to the council;

To make recommendations to the general assembly concerning legislation which in its opinion may be required, and if necessary, to draft measures for introduction;

To examine the effect of previously enacted general laws and public laws and to make inquiries from persons affected by the operation of those laws.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 220; G.L. 1956, §

22-8-1

.

22-8-2.
Composition — Appointment of members.

The legislative council shall consist of three (3) senators and four (4) representatives. At the January session of the general assembly in each odd-numbered year the president of the senate shall designate three (3) senators, not more than two (2) of whom shall be members of the same political party, and the speaker of the house shall designate four (4) members of the house of representatives, not more than three (3) of whom shall be members of the same political party, to serve as legislative councilors.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 221; G.L. 1956, §

22-8-2

; P.L. 1999, ch. 105, § 11; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 31.

22-8-3.
Organization of council — Meetings — Expenses of members.

Within two (2) weeks after their designation and appointment, the legislative council shall meet and at this first meeting shall choose a chairperson and a vice-chairperson and may appoint a director of research to perform any duties that the legislative council may designate. The council shall meet as often as may be necessary to perform its duties, provided in any event it shall meet at least once in sixty (60) days and not exceeding twenty-four (24) times in any one calendar year. Meetings of the council shall be at a time and place named by the chairperson. Members of the council shall be compensated for traveling and other necessary expenses incurred in attending the sessions of the council.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 221; G.L. 1956, §

22-8-3

.

22-8-4.
Illegal use of stamp.

Every person who, not authorized to do so, shall use or misuse the legislative council stamp which is affixed to the explanation portion of legislation or the bill itself or shall cause to make any notation in any manner whatsoever on the explanation portion of legislation or the bill itself that indicates or purports to indicate that it is approved by the legislative council, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months or fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or shall suffer both that fine and imprisonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 342, § 1.